test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-siom_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - siõm a-stem: # Noun 'rifle' - full paradigm
     siõm+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: siõm
     siõm+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: siõmmna
     siõm+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: siõmmnest
     siõm+N+Sg+Com+Indef: siõmmnin
     siõm+N+Ess+Indef: siõmmnen
     siõm+N+Par+Indef: siõmmned
     siõm+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [siõmmântaa, siõmmântää]
     siõm+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: siõmmân
     siõm+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: siõmmni
     siõm+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: siõmmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: siõmmnid
     siõm+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: siõmmnin
     siõm+N+Pl+Com+Indef: siõmmnivuiʹm
     siõm+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [siõmmnitaa, siõmmnitää]
